District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0685.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “151 Q Street Residential Economic Development Real Property Tax
Exemption Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. Chapter 46 of Title 47 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as
follows:
(a) The table of contents is amended to read as follows:
“§ 47–4618. 151 Q Street Residential Project tax exemptions.
(b) Section § 47-4618 is amended to read as follows:
“(a) For the purposes of this section, the term:
“(1) “Owner” means 151 Q Street Preservation LLC, its successors, affiliates, and
assigns.
“(2) “151 Q Street Residential Project” means the operations, including the
financing, refinancing, or reimbursing of costs incurred, of the mixed-use, multi-family
residential and ground-floor retail project located on the 151 Q Street Residential Property,

consisting of:
“(A) Approximately 603 units of residential condominium/apartment
house use totaling approximately 560,000 square feet of floor area and housed in 3 buildings;
“(B) Approximately 1,200 square feet of ground-floor retail space;
“(C) Below-grade parking garages;
“(D) Other ancillary improvements, including extension of Q Street, N.E.,
from Eckington Place to Harry Thomas Way;
“(E) Approximately 350 units designated affordable housing;
“(F) Designating no less than 302 of the 350 affordable units to be leased
to individuals and families with annual incomes not in excess of 80% of the Area Median
Income, as determined from time to time by the United Stated Department of Housing and Urban
Development and such households will pay rents that are no more than 30% of 80% of the
adjusted Area Median Income; and
“(G) Designating no less than 48 of the 350 affordable units to be leased to
individuals and families with annual incomes not in excess of 60% of the Area Median Income,
as determined from time to time by the United Stated Department of Housing and Urban
Development and such households will pay rents that are no more than 30% of 60% of the
adjusted Area Median Income.
“(3) “151 Q Street Residential Property” means the real property, including any
improvements constructed thereon, located in Lots 816, 817, 818, 819, and 820, Square 3576 (or
as the land for such lots may be subdivided into a record lot or lots or assessment and taxation
lots, condominium lots, air rights lots, or any combination in the future).
“(b)(1) Beginning in Tax Year 2031, 100% of the tax imposed by Chapter 8 of this title


on the 151 Q Street Residential Property shall be abated.
“(2) The real property tax abatement granted by paragraph (1) of this
subsection shall apply for 10 consecutive real property tax years.
“(3) The real property tax abatements granted by paragraphs (1) and (2) of
this subsection shall not exceed, in the aggregate, $21 million.
“(4) Prior to receiving the tax abatement granted under this subsection, the
Owner shall remedy any notice of infraction and pay any outstanding fine issued prior to October
2031 by the Department of Buildings.
“(5) While receiving the tax abatement granted under this subsection, the
Owner shall undertake ongoing capital improvements and routine replacements to maintain and
improve living conditions at the Property. Any building code infraction issued after October
2031 shall be addressed by the Owner within three months, provided tenant provides access to
the apartment in which there is a building code infraction and the Department of Buildings
provides a timely inspection. In addition, the Owner replace and upgrade in-unit fixtures and
finishes as necessary to maintain safe, functional, and modern residential units. Owner shall also
maintain and periodically renovate common areas, including hallways, the business center,
clubhouse, and outdoor amenities such as the pool area and associated furniture. Owner shall
ensure that work orders submitted by tenants are addressed in a timely manner and that all
building systems and facilities including the garage, security infrastructure, heating, ventilation,
and air conditioning systems, and plumbing are properly maintained and repaired as necessary to
ensure the Property remains safe, functional, and habitable for residents.
“(6) Beginning in December 2031 and on an annual basis thereafter, a
representative of the Department of Buildings shall transmit a written letter to the Owner and the


Office of the Chief Financial Officer’s Office of Taxation and Revenue detailing whether the
Owner is in compliance with paragraphs (4) and (5) of this subsection. The Owner shall have
thirty days after the issuance of that letter to cure any material deficiency in meeting its
obligations under paragraphs (4) and (5) or this subsections, provided tenant provides access to
the apartment in which there is a building code infraction and the Department of Buildings
provides a timely inspection, after which it will lose the tax abatement for the previous tax year if
Owner fails to provide commercially reasonable efforts to make the repairs in the thirty day
window.
“(c) The abatement pursuant to subsection (b) of this section shall be in addition to, and
not in lieu of, any other tax relief or assistance from any other source applicable to the 151 Q
Street Residential Property.
“(d) This section shall not:
“(1) Prevent or restrict to owner from utilizing any other tax, development, or
other economic incentives available to the 151 Q Street Residential Property; or
“(2) Limit the owner of the 151 Q Street Residential Property from appealing or
contesting its real estate tax assessment.”
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
100 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as


101 provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
102 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
103 Columbia Register.